Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1282.01
Printed certificate of title;
when issued.

Beginning
on the implementation date of the electronic title and lien system designated
by the Director of Motor Vehicles pursuant to section 37-1282, a lienholder,
at the owner's request, may request the issuance of a printed certificate
of title if the owner of the motorboat relocates to another state or country
or if requested for any other purpose approved by the Department of Motor
Vehicles. Upon proof by the owner that a lienholder has not provided the requested
certificate of title within fifteen days after the owner's request, the department
may issue to the owner a printed certificate of title with all liens duly
noted.

Laws 2009, LB202, § 6.